District of Columbia statutes.
21-2103

Construction of powers generally.

By executing a statutory power of attorney with respect to a subject listed in section 21-2101(a) , the principal, except as limited or extended by the principal in the power of attorney, empowers the agent, for that subject to:

(1)

Demand, receive, and obtain by litigation or otherwise, money or other thing of value to which the principal is, may become, or claims to be entitled; and conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything so received for the purposes intended;

(2)

Contract in any manner with any person, on terms agreeable to the agent, to accomplish a purpose of a transaction, and perform, rescind, reform, release, or modify the contract or another contract made by or on behalf of the principal;

(3)

Execute, acknowledge, seal, and deliver a revocation, lease, notice, check, release, or other instrument the agent considers desirable to accomplish a purpose of a transaction;

(4)

Prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to a claim existing in favor of or against the principal or intervene in litigation relating to the claim;

(5)

Seek on the principal’s behalf the assistance of a court to carry out an act authorized by the power of attorney;

(6)

Engage, compensate, and discharge an attorney, accountant, expert witness, or other assistant;

(7)

Keep appropriate records of each transaction, including an accounting of receipts and disbursements;

(8)

Prepare, execute, and file a record, report, or other document the agent considers desirable to safeguard or promote the principal’s interest under a statute or governmental regulation;

(9)

Reimburse the agent for expenditures properly made by the agent in exercising the powers granted by the power of attorney; and

(10)

In general, do any other lawful act with respect to the subject.

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-147, § 2, 45 DCR 3853
This section is referenced in § 21-2117.
1981 Ed., § 21-2103.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act.